Biker responacts lightning speed and prevents worse
On Friday evening, a traffic accident occurred on the road between Machtolsheim and Merklingen, in which a motorcyclist was slightly injured thanks to his rapid reaction.
Car ist overlooks bikers
A 44-year-old motordriver wanted to turn at 21.30 p.m. with her VW from Merklingen to turn left onto Landesstraße 1230 towards Machtolsheim.
She overlooked the 24-year-old motorcydriver coming from the direction Nellingen.
During the collision, hand and foot brake levers fly away
The biker still tried to doavoid the car, but still pped it at the rear of vehicle.
Due to the pping process, the hand and foot brake levers were torlished at the Suzuki and the driver was no longer able to brake.
He minpresent, he stecontrolled his motorcycle in the Grünsteifen next to the roadroad and let it roll out there without coming down.
Biker suffers leg injury
Due to the collision with the car, the biker suffered an injury to the Beim and had to be treated in a clinic.
Mamming: Corona mass infection: 174 Thers infected
After a Corona mass infection on a large vegetable farm in Mamming, Lower Bavaria, almost 500 people are under quarantine and are no longer allowed to leave the company.
A security service monitors the ban out ban.
A total of 174 harvesters were tested tested for the Corona pathogen Sars-CoV-2 during the series examination, as the district amt Dingolfing-Landau announced on Saturday evening.
"In order to avoid further spread, unfortunately we unfortunately have to take this step to protect the population," explained District Administrator Werner Bumeder (CSU).
Previously, seven employees had already infected in the company - this was the occasion of the series test.
The company is a large vegetable farm that grows strawberries, cucumbers, cabbage and beetroot - but the cucumbers only for inlglasses.
Mamming is a rural municipality with a good 3,300 inhabitants not far from Dingolfing with its large BMW plant.
Bumeder appealed to the citizens to keep peace: "According to our information, it is a closed group of people".
On the farm, infected were separated from uninfected employees, the site is now surrounded by a barrier fence.
The ens and SPD gave co-responsibility to the state government.
The two opposition factions accused Prime Minister Markus Söder (CSU) and his cabinet of neglecting the control of the shelaccommodations of seasonal workers.
"This can take revenge bitterly if such local infection events have to take and regional lockdowns have to be arranged," said Jürgen Mistol, the parliamentary managing director of the Greens.
The SPD sees this quite similar this: "After the Corona outbreak in the Wiesenhof-Schlachthof in mid-May, we have already demanded for a special control program for farms with harvesters May," said environmental expert Florian von Brunn.
"In view that the hygiene conditions at the workplace and the housing conditions must be sharply controlled.
This obviously did not happen. "
The outupbreak come "with announcement".
Underground station Aidenbachstraße: Dangerous dispute: 19-year-olyear-old falls into the track bed to Schubser
In a dispute between two youth groups at Aidenbachstraße underground way station, a 19-year-old fell through a thrwer and slipped into the track bed.
Obersendling - On Friday there was a dispute between two youth groups at Aidenbachstraße underground way station at 4.: 15 p.m.
A passer-by alerted the police, aching with several strips.
According to the first investigation, a Munich (17) pushed a 19-year-old to ground.
The young man slipped over the platform edge and fell into the track bed.
People from the 17-year-old group helped the man climb out of the track.
There was no danger from a coming railway.
As the police say, there were clashes between the two people.
The 17-year-old initially fled from the crime scene, but his personal details could be determined in retrospect.
Accompanied by his father, he went to Police inspecspecinspection 29.
The 17-year-old is investigated for assinjury.
Report: Seehofer pushes for longer data retention
data retention is currently suspended.
However, Federal Minister of the Interior Horst Seehofer calls for an extension of the storage period after a media report.
He wants to strengthen the fight against child abuse.
Federal Minister of the Interior Horst Seehofer (CSU) calls for extended data retention after a media report - instead of the planned ten weeks.
As the "Bild am Sonntag" reports, Seehofer asked Minister of Justice Christine Lambrecht (SPD) asked in a letter for a quick change to the law.
Seehofer therefore wants to step strengthen the measures against child abuse.
He considers it makes sense "make urgently needed adjustments in the law now," es the newspaper from the letter.
data retention is currently suspended.
A decision of the ECJ is expected to.
However, Seehofer, wants the changes beforehand, so that they could be applied immediately after a possible positive judgment, the report continues.
A spokesman for the Ministry of Justice told the newspaper that it could only be sible whether legal adjustments are required if the courts had decided.
In the fight against child abuse and child pornography, Seehofer, together with the interior ministers of the states, had already spoken out favour for data retention in June.
NBA: ou Williams
Excitement in the NBA!
Lou Williams (33), Los Angeles Clippers basketball professional, is said to have left the tournament in Disney World in Orlando, Florida with permission for a funeral.
According to US media reports, he visited the strip club "Magic City" in Atlanta in the evening.
Williams, who is said to have admitted the visit according to ESPN information, is back in Isloation, is tested daily on Covid-19.
His reason for the visit: Chicken Wings.
Last February last year, "Sweet Lou", as he is called in the NBA, has already expressed his love for exactly these Wings.
The American wrote: "Magic City and Blue Flame (another strip club in Atlanta,) have the best Wings in the city."
NBA insider Shams Charania announced on Twitter on Sunday that NBA Williams has prescribed a ten-day quarantine.
The Clipers star ses the first two official games after the test game phase.
In Disney World, the NBA wants to play the Corona season.
Currently, the best 22 teams with training games are preparing for the season final which begins at night of Friday.
Söder expresses on the corona position after mass infecton
Munich - Minister of Health Minister Melanie Huml (CSU) has already announced a test offensive for large farms on Sunday.
The press conference will be shown live on our homepage.
The case in Mamming in the district of Dingolfing-Landau has starled authorities and politics.
Almost 500 harvesters from several countries are currently working on the large vegetable farm, more than a third has become infected with the Corona pathogen.
The farm is now under quarantine and is bloclosed off with a construction fence.
No one is allowed to leave the terrain, food is delivered.
The authorities now free the good 3,300 inhabitants of the municipality now free corona tests.
Since the harvesters had little contact with the local population, the district office so far assumed that the infections have not spread beyond the farm.
"Conmorse": Confession of the alleged arson of Nantes
"My client has shown cooperative," said lawyer Quentin Chabert told the newspaper.
The defender added, "He greatly regrets the deeds, the confession was a liberation for him."
His mandate was "plagued by remorse and very taken away by the extent of the destruction".
In the case of a conviction, according to the prosecutor's office, the man is threatened ten years in imprisonprison and a fine of 150,000 euros.
The Gothic Cathedral of St. Peter and Paul Cathedral in Nantes was severely damaged by a fire the night of Saturday last week.
The fire had broken out in three distant places in the church.
Laboratory tests dened the suspicion of arson.
The now imprisoned suspect had been arrested a few hours after the fire.
He was released after a day.
The man works as a volunteer for the diocese of Nantes and was responsible for the closure of the cathedral on the eve of the fire.
Since there was no trace of a violent invration into the church, he quickly came into the view of the investigators.
Discuss the abolition of the 50 + 1 rule
Former DFB President Reinhard Grindel has recommended thinking about the abolition of the 50 + 1 rule.
"German football should at least discuss lay conditions and clear rules for investors before the EU Commission creates completed facts," Grindel said the "picture on Sunday".
He stressed: "For the clubs that are likely to be dangerous to Bavaria and Dortmund, the 50 + 1 rules do not work anyway: see Leipzig or Leverkusen.
In this respect, one cannot not avoid around the debate whether it is not necessary to facilitate clubs who want to break into this phalanx the involvement of investors. "
However, he had doubts as to whether there is willingness in the German Football League to allow majority shardings, which are prohibited in the Bundesliga by the 50 + 1 rule.
"It remains a legal risk to draw investment fences around the location Bundesliga in a European internal market," said Grindel.
The former DFB oss sees the danger that "the attempts to ensure more competition balance in the Bundesliga will ultimately only weaken the competitiveness of our top clubs at European level, but not lead to more excitement in the championship".
Even a equal distribution of TV funds will not have a decisive effect.
"FC Bayern generated sales of 750 million euros, Borussia Dortmund of 500 million and RB Leipzig of 300 million.
The differences are already immense among the first three clubs.
The other 15 clubs have an average budget of 130 million, "explained the 58-year-old.
Looking view to the past, Grindel feels betrayed.
"Unfortunately, there were people who noticed this mistake and pierit to the press instead of addressing it," Grindel said about the accepadoption of an expensive watch that had led to his resignation in April 2019.
"That has already occupied me lot."
He had received the gift worth around 11,000 euros from a Ukrainian funcofficial.
"I committed a compliance violation, and it was right to draw the consequences it," Grindel.
"With the ominous watch gift I dealt completely transparently and unsuspously.
Many at the DFB knew about it "."
He never "made a flsecret of the gift," assured the 58-year-old.
"This may be called naive, at least this form of transparency was the complete opposite of corruption."
"Black Lives Matter": Ininjured and a dead
The protests against police violence in the United States have worcalsenated by Donald Trump's use of federal police in several cities.
On Saturday, there were clashes between demonstrators and police in various cities.
Three people were injured in Louisville, and 16 people were arrested in Seattle.
In Austin, a person was killed by shots, while a demonstration train was just crossed a section.
Previously, there had clashes in Portland during protests against racism and police violence.
The security forces, including the federal police officials, used tear gas on the night of Saturday and forcibly led demonstrators.
Hundreds of, partly armed demonstrators marched through Louisville in Kentucky on Saturday and demanded that those responsible for the death of Breonna Taylor be held accountable.
The 26-year-old student was shot March in a drug raid at her home in Louisville in March.
The goal of the raid was someone else who did not live there, and no drugs were found.
On Saturday a member of a group that describes itself an armed alliance of black Americans fia shot, three people were injured.
According to NBC, they were taken to the hospital.
None of them floated in danger danger.
The police set up barricades because counter-demonstrators of a white militia had also formed.
In was no between the two groups.
In Austin, Texas, a person was shot and died in of a "Black Lives Matter" demonstration.
The police police took a suspect into custody.
She has not provide further information on the circumstances of the crime.
According to the New York Times, Mayor Steve Adler said that he was, like many in the city, he was "inconsolable and stunned" because of what had happened.
In the American metropolis of Seattle, demonstrators clashes with the police on Saturday.
They set construction fire in front of a youth prison, the police used glgrenades and pepper spray.
According to the Seattle Times, 16 people were arrested for resistance police or assharm.
A courthouse was set on fire in the city of Oakland, California.
A small group of demonstrators hit windows, shot down fireworks, and ded police officers ded with lasers, told the Oakland police on late Saturday evening (local time).
The fire was quickly extinguished.
In Aurora, a suburb of Denver, Colorado, a car ve through a crowd ating on a highway.
As the police said, one of the demonstrators fired a gun and at least one person was taken to the hospital injured.
In addition, windows were hit in a court and a fire was placed, as the police reported.
Investigations were taken.
Rakoczy in Bad Kissingen: Historical costumes defy Corona
Although the big ause in the spa town was missing, visitors and performers enjoyed the Rakoczy flair of the alternative program.
It was unusual for visitors, performers and organizers: the Rakoczy weekend without Rakoczy festival.
But: even though the big party mile in the city center was missing, the crowds and program highlights like Saale burning, Rakoczyball or procession, many got their money's worth of the Corona-compliant alternative program.
"I think we have managed in reading Rakoczy flair," says Board Director Sylvie Thormann.
The guests would have accepted it well.
In principle, one return to the beginnings of the Rakoczy festival, as well as the historans were the focus of the festival.
Pleasant atmosphere
Vesna Konhäuser has always been visited and her husband to the Rakoczy festival Bad Kissingen for than 25 years.
So this time in the Corona Year.
The couple made themselves comfortable at Luitpold Casino, watching the historical while strorolling and listen to the Cuban live music at the casino restaurant.
"I find it very pleasant," says Konhäuser.
She does not miss the crowds that otherwise belong to Rakoczy.
But this, she lacks the usual program highlights, especially Saale burns on Friday evening as well as the historic procession and the final fireworks on Sunday evening.
"That's a pity.
The weather would have been great this year, "she says.
Rakoczy riding tournament take place again
For the peractors of the historical spa guests, the alternative program partly meant more work.
For example, for Christina Gold, who particippart in the procession in a normal year and can be seen there on the carriage of the spa garten cafcafé.
This year she was walking in the city on Saturdays and Sundays costume.
"This's even more strexhauensting, otherwise we will have it easier," she says.
The equestrian club had less to do, even if individual riders were traveling in the park.
"We very much hope that the rider estrider quadrille will take place again next year," says Chairman Ulrike Waldhofen.
She announced that after several years break in 2021, a Rakoczy riding rian tournament would take place again.
28 Corona cases in Spanish second division club Fuenlabrada
The Spanish football second division CF Fuenlabrada is sliding deeper and deeper into crisis due to a corona outbreak.
Since the newcomer from near Madrid despite the first Corona cases on 20 July to a game in the city of A Coruña, one low low follows the next.
By Sunday, 28 players or team members had been tested positively tested, one came to the hospital, as the club announced.
Fuenlabrada from the city of the same name southwest of Madrid still had the chance to reach the promotion playoffs.
Now even the relegation to the B group of the Second League threatening.
The match against Deportivo La Coruña last Monday was cancelled last moment, the prosecutor's investigdetermined because of a possible offence against public health, the supreme sports authority CSD is considering the forced relcent of the club.
Players and other team members are quarantine in a hotel.
"Until the sixth day of quarantine, they have not received a fresh towel and gel," wrote the sports newspaper "AS".
Photos see how players would have hung underwear and club clothing in their rooms in the hotel to dry after they apparently had to wash them themselves.
The bed linen was not changed for five days.
Another problem is food.
Neither is good nor sufficient, wrote "AS".
The Club management, on the other hand, announced that they were satisfied with the hotel.
The accusation of deliberately endangpublic health was rejected by the club's lawyer, Javier Tebas Llanas.
There had not violated the Corona rules established by the Football Association, the son of the president of the Spanish Primera Division, Javier Tebas, stressed as the news agency Europa Press and the sports newspaper "Marca" reported.
Before the departure, there were four infected persons until 19 July, but all of were isolated and did not elled along.
Direcbefore the flight on Monday to A Coruña, all players and team members were re-tested.
When the team was already in A Coruña, the Corona test was positive for "five or six" other team members.
The game was cancelled 60 minutes before the kick-off, said Tebas Llanas said.
Police must capture horses tn in steam compartment
Two animals were on the street.
The police led her back to her owner.
On Sunday morning shortly before 6 o'clock, a road user informed two free-running horses on the feeder between the conflujunction of Donnersdorf / Steinsfeld and the motorway Theres motorway.
At arrival of the officials arrived, the horses were already between the feeder and the village of Dampfach.
After the trust of the horses could be gained shortly before the steam ers, they could a rope carried in the patrol car.
Cycling list Tony Martin: Career continuel conceivable
Time trial specialist Tony Martin is thinking about a continuation of his career.
Frankfurt / Main - The seven-time time trial world champion Tony Martin can well imagine continuing his cycling career.
"I am currently removing the team the framework conditions how and in what form it could continue," said the 35-year-old of the "Frankfurter Allgemeine Sonntagszeitung".
Martin is currently employed by the Dutch team Jumbo-Visma and had considered ending his career this year before the break Corona break.
Negotiations with his team are also about the number of race days, he said.
Or other problems that would plague him as a father of father, Martin said.
He used to get up after a fall, and the first thought was: "Quickly back to the wheel.
Today I think as the father of a little daughter: what if ".
The professional cyclist admitted that there are certainly aspects with which he is increasingly difficult.
"But it was good me to from the Corona time what I have about cycling and how much fun it is me."
The time trial specialist returns the competition at the Tour de l'Ain (5 to 9 August).
Bavaria: At least four dead on Bavaria's streets on weekweekend
The beautiful weather attracts bikers to the streets in many places.
For at least three people, the tour on motorcycle ends fatally.
An 18-year-old pedestrian also dies.
Schönthal - In case of accidents on Bavaria's streets, several, mostly young people died on the weekend.
An 18-year-old motorcyclist was captured on Saturday at Schönthal (Cham district) by a car that came to the opposite track.
Why the car got on the countertrack was initially unclear.
In Upper Bavaria, a 22-year-old lia horse-drawn carriage on his machine on Saturday.
According to the police, he was downhill at Beilngries.
In a left turn he coluncashed against the carriage.
His injuries were so severe that he died at the scene of the accident.
Of the twelve inmates of the carriage, a man was seriously and a man was slightly injured, as the police told.
In another fatal accident, an 18-year-old died in Bad Kötzting, in Upper Palatinate.
He had laid on a street on the night of Sunday and was run by a 42-year-old driver.
After the police, the 18-year-old wanted to sleep.
The driver could no longer brake in time.
At Schönberg (district Freyung-Grafenau) a 57-year-old biker boashed against a car Saturday in a right turn despite full braking.
He died at the scene of the accident.
The 57-year-old driver suffered a shock, the remaining three people in the car were uninjured.
The safety of motorcyclists was discussed on Saturday by Bavaria's Minister Transport Minister Kerstin Schreyer (CSU).
In a letter to the organizer of the biker protests announced August against driving bans, Gabor Kovacs, announced for August, the Minister referred to extensive investments such as underride protection on guardils and the defusing of dangerous curves.
"For the safety of motorcyclists, we have achieved a lot in recent years," the letter.
"The number of motorized two-wheelsts killed decreased by around 28 percent compared to 2011."
Kovac tests with Monaco against Frankfurt
Frankfurt / Main (dpa) - For football coach Niko Kovac there will soon be a reunion with Eintracht Frankfurt with his new Club AS Monaco.
The eight-time French champion will perform on 1 August (6 p.m.) at the Hesse, the former club of the Croats.
For the Bundesliga club it is the first and only hardurance test before the second leg in the Europa League against FC Basel (6 August).
Because to the Coronavirus pandemic, the encounter is held without spectators.
"We are especially looking forward to this game.
It's always nice to come to Frankfurt and meet friends, "explained Kovac.
Sporty this is an interesting test, said the 48-year-old.
Before joining to FC Bayern Munich, Kovac had trained the Hesse from 2016 to 2018 and led them to a victory in the DFB-Pokal.
"A top-profile opponent like Monaco is a good test for us in terms of game against Basel.
Like all Frankfurt, I look looking forward to reyou again with Niko Kovac, "said Eincht coach Adi Hütter.
The 50-year-old Austrian had succeeded the Croat in Eintracht.
In March, the Frankfurt lost the eighfinal first leg against Basel in their own stadium with 0 – 3.
Almost 50 new infections: Landkreis Hof just past the lockdown
In the district of Hof, the number of known new Corona infections increased on the weekend: from 39 on Friday and 43 on Saturday (a person has recovered and no longer falls into these statistics) to 47 on Sunday.
In addition, there is a case in the city of Hof.
Thus, the Hof approaching the critical mark of 50 new infections per 100,000 inhabitants in a week.
700 dead by monsoon rain in Southeast Asia
More than 9 million people are affected by the severe floods in Southeast Asia, especially in Bangladesh, India and Nepal.
Due to the strong monsoon rain, a total of 700 people were killed.
In Bangladesh, the Red Crescent in Boboats is trying to reach the isolated people.
Entire villages are under water.
The farmers have lost their harvests.
Tank morrhinos in National Park die by landslides
In Kaziranga National Park, several of the 120 tank rhinos died from landslides.
They are under protection and applicable than endangrisk of extinction.
This year, the floods are particularly bad, which scientists to climate change.
According to the United Nations, Bangladesh is one of the most countries most affected by global warming.
New apartments are empty
In the village of Cox's Bazar in south of Bangladesh, the state has built apartments for 650 displaced by the floods ed.
So far, a few have moved.
It is difficult to bring people to Cox's Bazar.
Also enthusiasm in Grenezn.
If who used to have a house, it was also so small and like a hut, often do not want to spend your life in a large block of ats.
Many apartments are empty, but - as the government wants - are soon be occupied from those who have lost their house to the floods.
60 Corona infections in just one day in Vienna
In a 24-hour comparison, 60 new Corona infections were reported in Vienna - there were 22 new infections in Lower Austria.
The Landessanitätsdirektion Vienna and the medical crisis staff of the City of Vienna regularly inform about the current case figures and further key figures for the CoVId--19 virus: as of Sunday, 26 July 2020, 8: 00 a.m., positive tests are confirmed in 4,840 (+ 60) Vienna.
The number of deaths associated with the virus remains unchanged 204.
4,090 (+ 48) People have recovered.
22 new Coronavirus infections in Lower Austria
The number of coronavirus infections in Lower Austria increased by 22 to 3,288 on Sunday.
According to the medical medical staff, a patient has recovered an.
This increases the number of genes to 2,936.
Currently Covid-19 247 patients in the state.
So date, 147,253 tests have been carried out.
105 people died in connection with lung disease.
Argentina rejects credicounter-offer by creditors
The new demands could not be met, the Ministry of Economy in Buenos Aires said on Saturday.
"This would be not only irresponsible, but also unjust," a statement said.
"While 50 percent of children in Argentina live in poverty, we cannot increase the short-term profits of our creditors."
The debt of the second largest economy in South America is no longer viable on the current conditions.
That is why Argentina calls on its private creditors to ve some of their demands of around $66 billion (around 59 billion euros).
If there is no agreement, the country is again threatened with state bankruptcy.
It would be the ninth payment default in Argentine history.
Most recently, lenders had demanded higher interest on government bonds and changes to some contractual clauses.
However, the Argentine government adhercking to its last offer and is not ready for any further concessions.
Argentina is in a severe financial and economic crisis.
The inflation rate last more than 50 percent.
For the current year, experts expect a decline in economic power of around ten percent.
At the end of May, Argentina had not settled interest of $503 million, slipped into a limited loss default.
Professionving ally - private yet
"It's going super well" - Dr. Stefanie Kramer draws this conclusion after her first days in the notarioffice in Eggenfelden.
In the end, everything went very quickly: in the mid-May, Dr. Stefanie Kramer learned that she will succeed Lutz Feller at the Eggenfelnotarioffice.
Six weeks later, at the beginning of July, the lawyer began up the work, the normal day-to-day business has long been running on full swing.
"However, I still have to arrive privately," she explains in conversation with the Rottaler Anzeiger and laughs.
The short lead time was of course not enough to move the centre from Regensburg completely to Eggenfelden, reports the native Dingolfingerin.
She she is with her husband, who works in Regensburg as a judge at the district court, in looking of a suitable apartment or a house in the city.
At least her husband was still able to apply for parental leave at short notice in order to ensure the care of the two daughters (3 ½ and 1 ½ years old).
In order not to have to commute every day from Regensburg every day, she has an overnight stay with her parents in Dingolfing, explains the 39-year-old.
Growing up in the neighboring district, the city of Eggenfelden has of course long been a to for a long time.
During visits site with her family in recent months, she stated: "Eggenfelden is a really beautiful small town".
She was all the more pleased that she did the race in the selection process for the vacancy.
Her native eland of Lower Bavaria plays a central role in Dr. Stefanie Kramer's professional career: After studying law in Passau, she completed her legal ineship and the 2nd state examination in Regensburg.
After several positions as a notary or, among in Rehau and Hof in Upper Franconia, Babenhausen in the Unterallgäu and Regensburg - during this time she also "incidentally" her doctorate in labour law - she took her first position as a notary in Rotthalmünster in the district of Passau in 2012.
In 2016, she went on parental leave, followed by the move to Regensburg.
Since then she has took over representative services in various notarial departments.
When the job in Eggenfelden was advertised because of the approaching retirement of Lutz Feller, she had seen the right time for full professional entry, explains the 39-year-old explains.
The team of its predecessor, who will take over the holiday representation at the notarial office in the future, completely taken over Dr. Stefanie Kramer - and has a praise for the law firm team: "It is going super well!"
The fact that she can rely on well-rehearsed processes here makes it easier for her to take care of the upcoming relocshift of the private life.
In terms of kindergarten or criativity scene places, she has already contcontact with a local institution.
And if everything works out as desired, she hopes to able to pursue her hobby here soon - and to get to know the most beautiful jogging routes of the Rottal.
BVB plans to league class with a maximum of 15,000 spectators
Dortmund The largest German football stadium in Dortmund will not even be 20 percent filled at the start of the season in event of a fan return.
"Due to the distance regulation, which must be be comply, we are currently planning with 12,000 to 15,000 spectators," said Borussia Dortmund's Managing Director Carsten Cramer told the "Tagesspiegel".
Normally, the arena in the district city at Bundesliga Games holds a just over 81,000 spectators.
In the last season ghost games season caused by the Corona pandemic, the BVB had lost around four million euros per per game.
The Cramer responsible at the BVB for marketing, digitization and internationalization hopes that in addition to the normal spectplaces, some of the approximately 4,000 seats in the hospitality sector can also be opened again: "It is of course a blow to the office if these revenues break away completely".
In view of the ongoing Corona crisis, everyone are currently "well advised to take a stable sidedellength".
"If many companies are not doing well and 6.8 million people are short-time in Germany alone, then the need for entertainment is limited," explained Cramer.
The Dortmund marketing bchief praised the BVB professionals for their salary partial renunciation, which is intended to help overovercome the crisis: "Of course, players know that their salary unciation has a different effect than we putting time 100 people work in merchandising on short-time work."
Tiny miracles: Early start to life with a few hundred grams
Hardly heavier than a Packerl of butter, just three tablespoons of blood throughout his body: that was Gabriel when he was born - he weighed exactly 273 grams.
The boy is one of about 400 mature ies, which are cared for annually at the Graz Children's Clinic.
A quarter of them weighs less than 1,500 grams, a few - like Gabriel and his brothers Raphael and Michael - are extreme lightweight weights with not even one kilogram of birth weight.
They are so small and born so early that neither lungs nor intestines nor muscles are fully formed.
Their skin is sometimes so delicate that they could hurt the electrodes of an ECG.
And they are so tiny that they sometimes wear doll's clothing and mini diapers specially made for them.
But not so small that they were not in voice - "and how", smiles Berndt Urlesberger sm.
"Even if of course they don't scream as loud as big babies".
When the whiteboard becomes a stage
Despite Corona Theater in the classroom: The whiteboard as a stage experienced the 9th classes of the St. JacGymnasium in Abtsgmünd shortly before the start of the holiday.
Actress Julia Sylvester from the Theater der the Stadt of Aalen presented the students the production "Das Heimatkleid" - by video.
Afterwards, the students were able to exchange the piece and the performance via Skype with the actress and the director Winfried Tobias.
The idea for the performance format from the current Corona situation had born.
Teacher Teresa Nar was pleased about the enrichment of teaching.
Even though all participants agreed at the end that the direct encounter in the theatre and stage room would offer even additional stimuli, also sees the potential for contact to the schools in the theatre.
"If we further improve the technical framework, this could be an interesting addition to the game operation," emphasised director Winfried Tobias.
First round drawn: TSV 1860 would meet Eintracht Frankfurt at the DFB-Pokal
Should the TSV 1860 qualifies for the DFB -PokCup, the lions meet Eintracht Frankfurt in the first round.
This resulted in the draw on Sunday.
Munich - Sixty possible opponent in the first round of the DFB Cup is certain.
The lions would meet Eintracht Frankfurt successful qualification.
This resulted in the draw on Sunday evening in the ARD sports show.
Because the field of participants is not yet complete due to the corona pandemic, placeholders were used in the draw.
Due to the voluntary renunciation of semi-final opponent FC Memmingen, the TSV 1860 is already in the final of the Bavarian TotCup (4 or 5 September).
There the lions meet either the Würzburger Kickers or Viktoria Aschaffenburg.
If second division Würzburg reach the final, sixty would already be qualified for the first round in the DFB -PokCup.
Otherwise, the Giesinger would have to prevail in the final against Regionalliist Aschaffenburg.
The first round of the DFB Cup will be place between 11 and 14 September and thus one week before the third division start.
"Gone by the wind": film legend Olivia de Havilland is dead
film legend and Oscar winner Olivia de Havilland is dead.
She died of natural death on Sunday in Paris at the age of 104, confirmed her spokeswoman to the German Press Agency.
de Havilland was known for her role as Melanie Hamilton in the southern epic "Gone by the Wind" (1939).
Born in Tokyo as child of British parents, Olivia de Havilland moved to California as a toddler.
The Austrian theatre man Max Reinhardt discovered the 19-year-old in the role of Hermia of Shakespeare's "Midsummer Night's Dream".
The film studio Warner Brothers signed her for seven years and brought her out big alongside Eroll Flynn.
She made eight films with the heartbreaker.
In 1946 she won her first Oscar in the leading role of "To Each His Own".
The film was ened in Germany under the title "Mother Heart".
Three years later, the award came as Best Actress in William Wler's "The Heiress".
She was also received recognition as a neurotic eccentric in "The Dark Mirror" and "The Snake Pit".
Daphne du Maurier suggested her in 1952 for the lead role in the film adaptation of her novel "My Cousin Rachel".
The play was a worldwide success.
With her longtime friend Bette Davis she played in "Wieullaby for a Leipse".
His Benjamin marriage to the writer Marcus Goodrich (1946 to 1953) produced his son Benjamin.
In Paris de Havilland married the journalist Pierre Paul Galante and had his daughter Gisèle with him.
This marriage also broke up.
Rum, rumors of an affair with former British Prime Minister Edward Heath were never confirmed.
"Road to Timmendorf": Beach volleyball: Thole / Wickler miss final at Comeback
The World Cup Julius Thole and Clemens Wickler missed the final at the beach volleyball tournament "Road to Timmendorf".
At the meeting of the top teams in Düsseldorf, they lost fintheir national team colleagues Nils Ehlers and Lars Flüggen with 1: 2 (17: 21, 21: 17, 19: 21).
Most recently Thole / Wickler played at the World Tour Final in Rome in September of last year.
In the final on the Rhine, their conquerors Ehlers / Flüggen scored a defeat against the surprise team Lukas Pfretschner and his interim partner Steven van de Velde with 0: 2 (17: 21, 17: 21).
In addition to the show tournament, three starting places were played for the German championships played in Timmendorfer Strand at the beginning of September: The tickets were secured by Armin Dollinger / Simon Kulzer, Manuel Harms / Richard Peemüller and Simon Pfretschner / Milan Sievers.
Kalbitzejection from AfD confirmed - FDP speaks of "fig leaf"
The exclusion of Andreas Kalbitz from the AfD is only a "fig leaf from the point of view of the FDP and does not change the character of the party.
"The AfD is the parliamentary arm of the right-wing extremists in Germany.
Andreas Kalbitz is only part of the top of the iceberg of the radicals in the AfD, "said FDP interior politician Benjamin Strasser of the news agency dpa in Berlin.
On Saturday in several, the Federal Court of Arbitration of the AfD confirmed the excluulsion of Kalbitz, which of the Federal Board had decided in May.
Kalbitz is chairman of the AfD parliamentary Group in the Brandenburg Landtag.
"If the AfD were really wanted about consistently removing right-wing extremists from their party, functionaries such like Björn Höcke and his suplowers would have long since been expelled," said Strasser.
"However, there is no political will in the AfD, because right-wing extremism now belongs to the party".
CSU Secretary General Markus Blume said similarly: "The fact that Andreas Kalbitz is now remains excluded does says nothing and does not change anything," he said the "world on Sunday".
"Rather, there speaks volumes how many frenetic supporters still have a right-wing extremist in the middle of the AfD."
Blume assumes that the AfD will land below five percent in elections the future.
"The days of the AfD in the parliaments are numbered".
Kalbitz was one of the spokesmen of the officially dissolved "wing" around the Thuringian AfD state and group chairman Björn Höcke; the Verfassungsschutz classifies the emonation as a "secure right-wing extremist aspiration".
In May, the AfD federal board Kalbitz throout of the party.
As the reason he stated that Kalbitz had not stated an earlier membership in the now bannbidden far-right "Heimattreloyuen Deutsche Jugend" (HDJ) and with the Republicans party.
Kalbitz denies membership in the HDJ.
The chairman of the Left parliamentary faction in the Brandenburg Landparliament, Sebastian Walter, also stressed that the decision of the Federal Arbitration ration does not change the character of the AfD: "The wolf only eaten chalk.
The AfD remains a far-right party, whether with or without calitz ".
This decision did not weakaken the federal Party nor the right wing.
"The manoeuvre of the Meuthths troop is transparent.
One wants to escape further observation by the Protection of the Constitution and tries to get through under the radar, "said Walter.
"The AfD does not get rid of the spirits it called.
A expulection does not yet change, "commented Brandenburg SPD General General Erik Stohn enting on the decision in the Kalbitz case.
"Here the AfD association and the parliamentary group held their right-wing leader."
The legal dispute over Kalbitz's membership in the AfD will continue.
He announced on Saturday that he would now take civil law against the decision of the Federal Arbitration.
North Sea wind farms supply a good 21 percent more electricity
The wind power plants on the German North Sea fed 11.51 terawatt hours of electricity into the grid in the first six months of the year.
This is a good 21 percent more than in the same period of the previous year, network operator Tennet in Bayreuth.
Tennet is responsible for the transmission of the North Sea electricity to the mainland and the forwarding through the German electricity grid.
The wind turbines on the Baltic Sea, which do not part to the Tennet network grid area, have fed a further 2.22 terawatt hours (TWh) of electricity.
In total, the wind power from the North and Baltic Seas comes 13.73 TWh, compared to a good 11.64 TWh in the first half of 2019.
The wind harvest at sea thus accounts for almost 19 percent of the total wind power in Germany, which is about four percentage points more than a year ago.
New wind farms ensure higher generation capacities
The increased contribution of offshore wind energy results addition to wind conditions from higher generating capacities, because new wind farms have connected to grid over the past twelve months.
If the 1270 wind power plants in the North Sea were all run at full force at the same, they could generate 6.7 gigawatts of electricity.
The transmission capacity is sufficient for this; according to Tennet, it is 7.1 gigawatts.
By 2030, it is expected to rise to 17 gigawatts in the German North Sea.
"In Germany and the Netherlands, we are investing 20 billion euros in the expansion of offshore network connections," said Tennet Managing Director Tim Meyerjürgens.
In reality, wind farms cannot exploit their capacity at sea, but reach about 40 percent.
The previous record day this year is 2 January, when the North Sea wind farms generated more than six gigawatts of electricity.
On average, the North Sea wind turbines produce about 2.5 to 3.0 gigawatts of electricity, which corresponds to three to four nuclear power plants.
This could supply almost seven million households with electricity.
Art "Skirmish" - an exhibition by the Leipzig artist Christian Bold in the gallery of the Gmünder Kunstverein.
This was almost a small anniversary celebration for the 130 anniversary.
Birthday of the Gmünder Kunstverein: The exhibition opening "Skirmish" with works by the Leipzig artist Christian Bold bleed the usual setting after the Corona break.
Much more art lovers than usual followed the dialogue between the artist and the chairman of the Kunstverein, Professor Dr. Klaus Ripper.
The musical equivalent was provided by the band "Defenders of the Universe" on southern Kornhausplatz.
North of the gallery was the association "Sandtogether" involved.
Freital: Windbergfest cancelled due to Corona
The Windberg festival does not take place this year.
The city of Freital has cancelled the three-day festival planned in September.
In other years, more than 30,000 people had visited this city festival.
"We truly did not made this decision easy us and - aware of how difficult it is economically for the involved - hoped until the last minute," explained Lord Mayor Uwe Rumberg (non-party).
"But ultimately end, as the organizer, we are responsible for the health of many thousands of people."
If tens of thousands had flocked to the fixed grounds and the marquee, minimum distances, hygiene regulations and contact tracking could not have been complied in accordance with the current Corona protection regulation.
Or the restrictions would have been so strong that there would not have much left of a folk festival.
In addition, the organisational and monitoring effort would increase disproportionately many times over.
Rumberg soled next year.
Then the city of Freital celebrates its 100th anniversary with the Winterberg fest from 7 to 9 May 2021 and the Day of Saxons from 10 to 12 September 2021.
Dressage Olympic champion Werth in Achleiten not to beat
Achleiten - The six-time Olympic champion Isabell Werth was the outstanding rider at the dressage tournament in Achleiten, Austria.
The 51-year-old from Rheinberg came four victories the weekend at four starts.
After winning a Grand Prix at the start with Weihegold and Quantaz, she was also not defeated on Sunday in the Grand Prix Special and in the freestyle.
At the 15-year-old mare Weihegold, Werth prevailSunday special against the Austrian Victoria Max-Theurer on Abegglen.
Also in the freestyle,, the Germans were clearly Saturday on Quantaz on Saturday in front of their 34-year-old student Victoria Max-Theurer.
Werth's winning horse Quantaz belongs to Max-Theurer.
The most successful dressage rider in the world is to establish the ten-year-old stallion in the Grand Prix.
For Quantaz it was the first freestyle ever.
Already the first tournament in Achleiten three weeks ago, Werth had won all important four competitions.
The last of the three international tournaments is planned for 14 to 16 August.
More more air traffic controllers in Worms
The Worms University goes into the air: The "DFS Deutsche Flugsicherung" creates a professorship for "Air Traffic Management".
A corresponding contract between the university and the DFS has now been signed in Worms.
The contract was initially concluded for three years and start in 2021.
With the professorship, it is possible to enable the start of studies not only in the summer but also in the winter semester.
This means that twice as many students to be trained as before.
At the same time, the capacities are evenly utilized in both the university and at the DFS Air navigation Academy.
DFS will advise the university on the establishment and filling of the professorship.
Represented at the university since 2019
Since the summer semester of 2019, the first students have part their training air traffic controller at Worms University of Applied Sciences in the Air Traffic Management.
Nine students have already started this year.
So far, the experience of DFS are very positive, the achievements of the students are excellent.
The combination of studies and pilot pilot training makes significantly contribution to further increasing the attractiveness of the pilot profession.
"In these times, support not economically easy us economically.
However, we firmly expect air traffic to recover and grow again in the long term.
In order to fulfil our legal mandate in the future, we need highly qualified personnel, "says Professor Klaus-Dieter Scheurle, Chairman Managing Director of DFS at signing the contract.
"For DFS, the endowed professorship is a future-proof investment that will provide air traffic controllers a broad, interdisciplinary knowledge base in the long term.
We therefore continue the good cooperation with the university and at the same time underppin our attractiveness as an employer "
This is also underlined by Professor Dr. Jens Hermsdorf, President of Worms University of Applied Sciences,: "The endowed professorship forms an important bridge between science and industry.
With it, we would like to build on the existing cooperation with DFS Deutsche Flugsicherung as a practical partner for the dual bachelor's degree program in Air Traffic Management. "
The trust of German air traffic control is the both motivation and obligation for Worms University of Applied Sciences to further expand its teaching and research competence in the future fields of aviation transport.
In use for the air traffic controllers of tomorrow, the university could set very special highlights and innovative priorities for its students with the first endowed professorship for a dual course programme.
Dr. Denis Alt, State Secretary at the Ministry of Science, Continuing Education and Culture, emphasises: "Worms University of Applied Sciences has a unique selling point in Rhineland-Palatinate with its the field of air transport.
Today's signing of the cooperation agreement strengthens the profile of the university ".
Rescue helicopter lands on the A 45
Around 30 minutes, the A 45 motorway was fully closed on Saturday afternoon towards Aschaffenburg, as the rescue helicopter was in use after a traffic accident.
A 76-year-old drove straight with a Ford at 12.40 p.m. in the Alzenau-Mitte in the bend and landed on the guardrail.
Due to the impact, the front ta irbags triggered, the driver suffered minor injuries on the face and had to be taken to a hospital for treatment.
The injuries of the 72-year-old passenger were treated for by the emergency doctor and the patient was then flown to a hospital with the rescue helicopter.
At present, however, the police assume that there is no danger to danger.
The damaged vehicle, to which damage of about 2000 euros, had to be towed.
Heil wants to test other industries the meat industry
The Corona crisis once again brought to the conditions in parts of the meat industry.
Legisltightening are imminent.
But are they right - and will it stay there?
Federal Minister of Labour Minister Hubertus Heil (SPD) also wants to review other industries in accordance with the now planned strict regulations against grievances in the meat industry.
"We will look at the industry for the industry and then take suitable measures for the respective industry if it necessary," said Heil of the German Press Agency in Berlin.
Germany's employers are already warn against restriciting works contracts in general.
After the mass Corona outbreak at the meat giant Tönnies in North Rhine-Westphalia, the Federal Cabinet wants to pass a law of salvation this Wednesday.
Large slaughteries should no longer be allowed to use foreign personnel for slaughter, dismantling and meat processing.
For this purpose, the use of work contracts and temporary agency workers is to be banned there.
Employer President Ingo Kramer told the dpa: "Finger away from a general restriction of works contracts and of employment if you do not want to completely strangle the economy". "
Factory contracts, for example, for wide areas of crafts, the construction industry and plant construction the basis for their added value at the customer.
"The misconduct of individuals cannot destroy such an important instrument".
Heil assured: "My goal is not to proban works contracts everywhere in the German economy".
Work contracts are sible.
"When an industrial company orders a craftsman to install a security system, this is a normal work contract."
The German meat industry considers a ban on works contracts and temporary agency work in its industry alone unconstitutional.
It is not be explained why labour law when portioning and packaging cheese should be labour than sausage in future, a statement on the legislative project, as the "Neue Osnabrücker Zeitung" (Saturday) reports.
In a ban would, increase the price consumer price increase by 10 to 20 percent per kilo and product.
Many Eastern European employees from plant contractors worked in the industry according to the results of an examination of the NRW occupational and safety Administration partly 16 hours a day.
Often they had no break.
Wwas withheld for protective equipment or rent.
It was also noted that the situation in accommodation was often miserable employees.
Heil said that a relatively sharp law had already entered into force for the meat industry in 2017.
However, they were bypassed by "tricky constructions".
"Now it to be fundamentally ticleaned up".
The politician announced: "In the Occupational Safety and Safety Act, which we want to adopt in the cabinet at the end of July, are also measures that not only affect the meat industry - for example, higher test rates for occupational safety and safety or clear criteria for Community accommodation".
The draft to the dpa includes amendments to the Act on Secarding Workers' Rights in the Meat industry and the Occupational and Act.
Brandenburg's Consumer Protection Minister Ursula Nonnemacher (Greens) considers more intensive controls necessary.
"I would like us be able to even more controls in many supervisory areas: food controls, animal welfare, everything possible, for example animal transport," said Nonnemacher on Sunday in the RB programme "Brandenburg aktuell".
But more personnel positions are also needed for more controls.
Three dead in crash of ultralight aircraft in Germany
In the crash of an ultralight aircraft on an apartment family building in Wesel in the German state of North Rhine-Westphalia, according to the police, three people died.
A child was slightly injured.
Two other people were cued in the accident, said a spokesman of the district control center Wesel.
A to the parachute was found at the scene of the accident, according to the police.
The "Rheinische Post" reported citing on eyewitnesses that before the crash the aircraft had collided with a hot air balloon crash.
The house is a single or two-family house.
Further details were not known.
Cleartion of Frankfurt Opera Square is peacefully
A week after the riots in Frankfurt, the evacution of the opera Square also peacefully on the night after Sunday.
Finally, a few dozen people stayed on the square, but left it before the start of the curfew at 1 o clock.
The police had been deployed with numerous officers since the early evening, a larger police ent was seen throughout the city.
For the first time this weekend from midnight, there was a ban fraud for the opera Square, where riots had occurred a week ago.
Policemen had been attacked with bottles from the crowd of celebrations.
At least five officers were injured after police, several police vehicles were damaged.
The night for Saturday had also remained quiet.
Car fats over: Young woman seriously ely injured in case of an accident on Bundesstraße 83 at Hofgeismar
In an accident between Schöneberg and Hümme, a 21-year-old suffered serious injuries on Sunday at 13.25 m.
She was taken to the Klinikum Kassel.
With thermal imaging cameras, the fire brigade was sought for possible passengers.
According to the police, the woman travelled on Bundesstraße 83 towards her residence of Hümme, when her car left from the way for the unexplained cause and turned over several times.
In order to save the injured, the fire brigade had to cut the roof of the car.
Since it was unclear whether there was someone was still in the vehicle, the adjacent corn field was searched from the rotladder with a thermal imaging camera.
The drone adron from Warburg, which also works with thermal imaging cameras, had also been ordered for for people search.
However, the volunteforces did found anyone between the high corn plants.
The seriously injured was taken by the ambulance to the Kassel selKlinikum.
Almost 50 volunteters of the fire brigade Hofgeismar, Hümme and Schöneberg were on site.
The Bundeshighway was closed for two hours due to the accident.
Juventus Turin Champion in Italy
Turin - After a redeeming goal by Cristiano Ronaldo, record champion Juventus Turin has secured the Italian championship for the ninth time in series.
The team around the five-time world player made the 36th Scudetto of the club history perfect with a 2-– 0 (1: 0) on Sunday evening in the home match against Sampdoria Genoa.
Ronaldo scored 1 – 0 before half.
With 83 points, Turin, which competed without the last long injured ex-national player Sami Khedira, can no be ed from first one two match days before the end of season of Serie A.
The Inter Milan is seven points.
Juventus was harmless despite optical superiority in the first half, then Ronaldo met with the last action after a free kick variant.
The 35-year-old exploed target of Miralem Pjanic from the penalty area limit directly with a flat shot (45 + 7).
Against the more offensive guests Ronaldo was also involved in the 2: 0, after his shot Federico Bernardeschi (67) dusted.
This ensured the lackluster but decisive success.
The floul meter shot at the bar in the 89th minute may probably have correctly made Ronaldo himself with a view to the Torunter rating.
"It's complicated to stay mentally and physically for 90 minutes.
The games are strange, and the momentum changing very slightly, "coach Maurizio Sarri after the 1: 2 at Udinese Calcio on Thursday.
Especially the mental exhaustion of his players is great, said the Juve coach said.
Due of the defeat, the asts had not yet been able to make the championship perfect.
Juve owe the calming lead at the top of the table all to the weakness of the competitors.
In the eleven games before the match on Sunday, the San team had achieved only five victories.
Whether Ronaldo also becomes top scorer is questionable.
While the Portuguese superstar has scored 31 goals so far, the former Dortmund Ciro Immobile has already scored 34 goals in his account after its of three at the 5: 1 (1: 1) of the fourth Lazio Rome at Hellas Verona - as many as Robert Lewandowski contributed to the title win of FC Bayern.
The current Juve professional Gonzalo Higuaín holds the record in Italy.
The Argentine scored 36 goals for the SSC Naples in the 2015 – 2016 season.
In August, the next title opportunity awaits for the "Old Lady" of Italian football.
Juventus is in the round of 16 of the Champions League, but has to make for a 1-– 1 first page against Olympique Lyon on 7 August to reach the final tournament in Lisbon.
In the next knockout round, Real Madrid or Manchester City would wait as an opponent.
Baden-Württemberg: Over 250 illegal car races
Stuttgart - Despite all threatened penishalties and court rulings, motorists continue to accelerate in countless illegal races on Baden-Württemberg roads: Last year and the first four months of this year, the police in the southwest have already registered more than 250 illegal car races.
Although there are no comparative values for the years before, but the Raseders are increasingly doing work for the judicial authorities: At the prosecutors offices between Konstanz and Mannheim, a total of 155 investigation proceedings were conducted in 2018 for illegal races 2018, a year later there were already 252 and in the current year to the beginning of June already 151.
The races were less about organized events, as can be seen from the answer of the Ministry of the Interior to a request from the Landtags-SSPD.
In most cases, the drivers spontaneously eted against each other or they had taken fled from the police - this is also indicated as an illegal race.
German men between the ages of 18 and 60 at the wheel.
113 fines - 15 times imprisonment
Only in a comparatively few cases are the breers are caught and also asked to pay out: According to the Ministry of the Interior, a total of 113 fines have been imposed since 2018 and 15 imprisonsentences have been imposed.
However, there is no indicevidence that the number of illegal car races is actually increasing.
Rather, other motorists reacted more sensitively than earlier because of the number tragic accidents and processes of past years and indicated more frequently, said a ministerial spokesman.
Again and again, motordrivers sking down traffic order to gain space and use the free track for a race.
Last August, a dozen drivers were caught near Kirchheim unter Teck, three months earlier there were even 18 drivers on the A8 near Merklingen.
A81 is the most popular "race track"
On the A81, the police registregister even more races than on any other federal highway.
A speed limit made to slow down the speers on the particularly affected section between Engen and Geisingen.
The mostly high-priced and emed sports and luxury cars often have Swiss plates, because the drivers dodge to lawn Germany due to the high penalties for too fast driving and car racing in neighboring country.
For the SPD, the speed limit must not be reduced to a few distances: "With a general speed limit of 130 kilometers per hour, we would get this problem on motorways," says Martin Rivoir, the transport expert of the SPD state parliamentary group.
"The inhibition threshold for speers would be significantly higher if you are not here and there with 200 kilometers per hour and more".
Rivoir keeps less of enlightenment or image campaigns: "Anyone who disores all rules in such a way and puts not only their own life, but also the life of other road users risk, is hardly achievable with reason".
ADAC calls for stronger down police
The ADAC, on the other hand, this is not enough: "We assume that Rasers cannot be deterred by the speed limits," says Holger Bach, Head of Department of Transport and Environment at ADAC Württemberg.
It calls for additional and hargher controls on the affected routes.
It frequently the high-strength becomes more painful and momentous seriserious: Since January 2019 and until April 2020, three people have died in the races nationwide, of two uninvolved in a nighnight crash in Stuttgart's city centre and one in Gerlingen.
Two young men are said to won an car race in November.
One of the vehicles came from the road, ashed against a garden wall and remained on the side, the 18-year-old passenger died.
21 other people were been injured in the races of the past two years.
However to Interior Minister Thomas Strobl, sharghpenalties are not necessary: "Legislative need for action to sanction illegal motor vehicle races harder is not seen," says the paper of the Ministry of the Interior.
Blue light from 23 July: Thirsty burlarar steals drinks from snack
Rohrdorf: A man broken into a snack on Thursday in Rohrdorf (Calw County) and stolen drinks and cash.
A witness heard sounds in the valley straße at around 3.40 a.and ran towards the snack.
There he noticed a man who used drinks on the fridge drinks and then left the snack through a previously entrance door.
The perpetrator fled towards the meadows behind the snack.
According to the police,, the burglar also made used at a cash out and stole cash in the low three-digit range.
The suspect is described as follows: he is about 1.75 to 1.80 meters tall and of strong stature.
In fact he wore a black hooded sweater, black trousers and light shoes.
The police accept further testimevidence.
Ackermann sprumps to victory on the final stage at Sibiu Tour
Cycling list Pascal Ackermann won his second victory day on the final stage of the 10th Sibiu Tour.
The 26-year-old Palatine of Bora-hansgrohe team prevailed on the 109-kilometre long section with start and finish in Sibiu in the mass sprint, after he had already won a stage on Saturday.
It three and four for Ackermann.
His Austrian team mate Gregor Mühlberger prevwon ed overall.
The 26-year-old had confidently decided the mountain trial in the morning and thus took over the top in the classification.
Only 104 riders eted the final stage in the evening.
No less than 18 starters had fallen victim to the time limit in mountain trial.
"I'm really happy to start the season restart with a victory," Ackermann explained after his success on Saturday.
"The sprint was really hectic," said the 26-year-old.
300 meters before the finish he simply put on his sprint, "and it also worked perfectly".
According to the rules of the UCI World Association, a Corona test was carried out by all race participants and their companions six days before the start of the race.
During the entire tour, drivers and supervisors were separated from the organizational team and the media in isolated hygiene bubbles.
Spectators at the start and finish were not allowed.
Control center gave instructions on lay ateur resuscitation
Düsseldorf - Tragic accident on Sunday afternoon in Düsseldorf-Garath.
In an apartment building, a child (4) was suddenly lifeless in the water while bathing.
According to the fire brigade, the emergency call arrived at just before 13:'m.
"A control center ant immediately gave instructions on amateur resuscitation," said a fire refgokesman to BILD.
The arriving rescue workers took over the reviuscitation measures a little later.
The child, floating in danger of danger was transported to the university clinic under resuscitation.
Why is unclear it ashed is.
The police have routinely started investigation into the of the accident.
The fire refgokesman: "We start from a tragic accident in the apartment".
Nuremberg: Unapproved tuning meeting - police intervene, 700 vehicles and around 1100 people
Hundreds of cars and temporarily over 1000 people took part Saturday in a "tuning meeting" in the parking lot of a furniture store Saturday night.
The police implemented their announcement to control such events.
A large tuning meeting place on Saturday evening (25 July 2020) in Nuremberg Südstadt Nuremberg.
Several hundred vehicles were involved.
According to the Central Franconia, the Nuremberg traffic Police detected an increased number of vehicles traffic in the area of a large parking lot on Ingolstädter Straße around 10.30 p.m.
As a result, the police then carried out a large number of vehicle controls there.
Only recently, the police announced that they intention wanted to take action against so-called autoposers.
Illegal tuning meeting in Nuremberg: Only small part from the "scene"
The officials counted a good 700 vehicles and about 1,100 people, the police.
However, only a small part of those present can be assigned to the "autoposers" and tuning scene.
Apparently, most of the relevant scene responfollowed the police appeal.
Based basis on the vehicles and people on site, it can be assumed that these were mainly onlookers.
In addition, the majority of those present ed to the applicable infection protection regulations, in particular compliance with the minimum distance and the wearing of mouth-nose protection.
The control measures were completed around 1: 00 a.m.
In total, the officials such structural changes in 10 vehicles that the operating licpermit had extired.
Four of these vehicles had to be ensured.
No car races
There were no illegal car races.
"The police headquarters of Middle Franconia Police will continue to keep an eye on the events and will continue to out increased control measures, also in connection with the advgence of onlookers," it said.
The agency News5 spoke to Jürgen Schrödinger from the participating towing company involved: "We all have all beautiful rims, that we must not scratch," says Schrödinger.
Special belts would be used for this.
Also because the cars are wider, the company must to make sure not to cause damage.
"The young people should finally get their cars back unscathed.".
Figures by the employment agency: 900 susppicected cases of abuse during short-time work
Berlin - According the Federal Employment Agency (BA) investiginvestigate around 900 susppicected cases of abuse in short-time worker allowance.
"This is extremely little for more than 880,000 companies that have shown short-time work," said Daniel Terzenbach of the "Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung", responsible for operational business.
When many companies had suddenly applied short-time at the beginning of the Corona crisis time, the BA had to react quickly.
Normally the am lasts up to three weeks.
"So much time available at this hot phase.
We will take a closer look at the final settstatements.
There will certainly be lot.
We are not naive and have a long breath ".
Referations of abuse would often be from the affected employees or trade unions concerned.
In addition, the BA uses analysis software to detect abuse patterns.
According to Terzenbach, the BA is preparing for a possible wave of insolvency in autumn.
"Will there be significantly more insolventcies than in the previous year?
The assessments ge, but we arm for the case of the case and are already train our employees in the employment agencies for processing applications for insolvency money ".
The figures are still inconspicuous, said Terzenbach said.
World Heritage in Potsdam: Party in the New Garden solved
Potsdam - On Friday evening about 40 young people celebrated a party in the New Garden.
The collection was dissolved at 8.48 p.m. by the drivers of the Stiftung Presian ische Castles und Gardens (SPSG), the foundation on PNN request.
The young people then left the park.
On Saturday evening, some young people would played rugby in the New Garden.
The meadow was cleared by territdrivers, said SPSG spokesman Frank Kallensee on Sunday.
Again and again there are illegal celebrations in the parks
In the parks the foundation's parks, there are always ulations in where the distance and hygiene rules COVId--19 inance are not complied with.
At the end of June, there a celebration with about 300 people in the Babelsberg Park, a week later about 150 people celebrated in the New Garden.
Even without corona regulations, the parks are closed at dark.
The on the meadows is prohibited according to the parking regulations, there are only a few exceptions.
The foundation has complaining for a long time that visitors would leave more and more waste and destroy protected biotopes.
In Berlin, mean, illegal park parties have reached a different dimension.
In the Hasenheide in the district of Neukölln, 5,000 people celebrated an illegal techno party the night of Sunday.
The event was dissolved by the police.
Austria: Mass tests after Corona outupbreak in tourist resort
With hundreds of tests, authorities have responded to a Corona outbreak in the popular Upper Austrian tourist resort of St. Wolfgang.
The number of confirmed cases rose to 48, as by the state authorities in Linz.
More than 100 results were ending in the evening.
Accordingly, many of the infected are young interns in tourism companies, but at least one holiday guest has also been tested positively tested.
Reshabitidents, guests and tourism staff were asked to stay in their accommodation on Saturday evening.
The curfew was set at 23 o'm.
"There are there and there cancellations and cancellations" of bookings, said the head of the Tourist Wolfgangsee Tourist Board, Hans Wieser, the dpa.
Occguests also left prematurely.
St. Wolfgang is the most important tourist resort in Upper Austria, with more than 400,000 nights last year.
In a normal season, about a third of the guests are Germans.
On Friday, the first infections had publicly public.
The Saturday head of the district authority, Alois Lanz, defended on Saturday the behavior of the interns who had celebrated in several restaurants and might have infected there.
"We all liked to do this in our youth," he told the radio station Ö1.
However, two bars were closed on Friday to prevent further infections.
The Tourist Board launched an information campaign to raise ze young employees awareness of the dangers of Covid-19.
From Saturday, hundreds of employees, holidaymakers and locals were tested.
In addition, all guests who were in St. Wolfgang from 15 July were contacted.
The outupbreak evakens memories of the Austrian ski and party resort of Ischgl in Tyrol, which was a center of corona spread throughout Europe in the early phase of the pandemic.
In total, more than 1,1500 people Austria are currently infected with the virus in Austria.
The new infections focus on Vienna and Upper Austria.
Premier League: Man United and Chelsea qualiqualified for Champions League
London (dpa) - English football record champion Manchester United returns to the Champions League after a year of absence.
The Red Devils secured third place in on the last day of the Premier League by a 2-0 (0 0) win against direct competitor Leicester City.
The foxes must now have to settle with the Europa League because Chelsea passed by and also qualified fourth for the premier class.
In the fight against the descent, Aston Villa was allowed to cheer.
Manchester United took lead by a penalty ick by Bruno Fernandes (71st minute).
After a red card for Leicester City in the extra, Jesse Lingard (90 th + 8) the final result.
Chelsea, opponent of FC Bayern in the Champions League round of 16, won Wolverhampton Wanderers thanks to Mason Mount (45 + 1) and Olivier Giroud (45 th + 4) with 2-– 0 (2 – 0).
"That means a lot to me," said coach Frank Lampard, who is also as Chelsea coach in the final of the FA Cup against Arsenal his first season.
Chelseas's victory against Wolverhampton also ited from Tottenham Hotspur, who passed the Wolves with a meager 1 – 1 (1 – 0) at Crystal Palace and starts sixth in the Europa League.
Aston Villa won the distance duel with FC Watford and AFC Bournemouth, but had to tremble at West Ham United for long.
The late leadership of Jack Grealish (84) immediately compensated Andrej Yarmolenko (85).
The 1 – 1 (0 – 0) was enough because Watford lost Arsenal 2 – 3 (1 – 3).
The club, which ated three coaches in the season, relegafter five first division years.
Just like Bournemouth, who could not save by a 3 – 1 (2: 1) at FC Everton.
In the end, a point was missing.
Liverpool FC, which has been as English champion since the end of June, secured a club record with a 3 – 1 (1 – 1) victory at Newcastle United.
99 meters are the highest value the Reds have ever achieved in a football season.
Coach Jürgen Klopp narrowly missed the and his team in English football.
The Manchester City record with 100 points in the 2017 / 18 season.
After the Newcastle le lead in the first minute, Virgil van Dijk (38th), Divock Origi (59 9th) and Sadio Mané (89 9th) played the game on Sunday for Liverpool.
"For this wonderful club it was an extraordinary season," said goscorer van Dijk after the game, "that should inspire us to defend the title.
It be hard ".
In the end Premier League bosses should also be satisfied end.
Due to the Coronavirus crisis, football operations in England was interrupted from 13 March to 17 June.
In the meantime, an premature demotion or an discharge of the remaining games on neutral ground was discussed.
After all, however, the season could be played end without special incievents - but as in Germany without spectators in the stadiums.
Arrests and violence in demonstrations against Netanyahu
The protests in Israel against Prime of Minister Netanyahu are becoming increasingly violent.
During the night there were violent clashes.
The Israeli police forcibly took Jerusalem on the night of Sunday in Jerusalem against participants in a demonstration against right-wing conservative head Minister Binyamin Netanyahu.
Twelve people were arrested for participating in rirest, told police spokesman Micky Rosenfeld.
Among other things, police police used water cannons to dissolve the rally.
According to media reports, around 6,000 people gathered near Netanyahu's headquarters on Saturday evening.
They protested against unemployment, corruption and Netanyahu's dealing with the Corona crisis.
The protesters beat drums, blew in horns and called Netanyahu to resign.
Participants in a counter-demonstration were arrested supported Netanyahu, reported the news page "ynet".
People also demonstrated in many other places in Israel, including in front of the head government's private villa in the coastal town of Caesarea and in a park in Tel Aviv.
According to police, a man was arrested near Tel Aviv because it is suspected of having spraying pepper spray on demonstrators on the roadside from a moving car.
Another man was arrested after a stabattack on a demonstrator in the south of the country.
The demonstrator was slightly injured on his neck.
In Jerusalem and Tel Aviv there have recently been several demonstrations against Netanyahu.
The rallies accompany the corruption process against the head of government.
Finally, Netanyahu was also criticized for his handling of the Corona crisis.
Among other things is given premature osening and a lack of preparation for a second wave of corona wave.
The Corona crisis has the country ’ economy.
The unemployment rate was last more than 20 percent.
The number of new infections with the coronavirus in Israel recently rose to ever new record levels.
Accident at Ahlen (NRW) - Transporter kracht auf Auto - nine injured - Ruhrgebiet - Bild.de
Ahlen - A rear-end colsion claimed nine minor injured on Saturday afternoon on the B58 near Ahlen.
A driver with her two children (3, 5) towards Beckum.
The police: "Presably she had suddenly slowed down because she wanted to turn."
The driver of a Mercedes transporter who drove behind her must have seen this too late.
He crashed onto the car the back.
In the accident, three occupmates in the car and six in the transporter were injured.
Several ambulances took her to an surrounding hospital.
North Korea locks border town after Corona susppicion
Korea has far seen a "luminous success" in its own measures to defend the coronavirus.
Now the country is reports on a suspicion for the first time.
Due to a first official Corona suspicion in the country, North Korea has completely sealed off a big city for fear of a disaster.
Despite the strictest epidemiological defmeasures over the past six months, "the malvirus may have been introduced into the country," the state media reported.
The state of emergency was imposed for the region around the border town of Kaesong.
The communist leadership proclaimed the highest alarm.
Should the suspicion be confirmed, it would be the first official infection case with Sars-CoV-2 in the seisolated country.
According own, North had not registered a single infection and described its defmeasures as a "luminous success".
The information was doubted abroad.
According reports, the symptoms of disease symptoms were reportedly detected in an "outlier" who illegally crossed the military demarcation line between South and North Korea on 19 July.
The person left to South Korea three years ago and had now returned across the border.
For the border crossing within the four kilometwide and largely minmilitary buffer zone, there was initially no confirmation from South Korea.
However to reports by the national news agency Yonhap, South Korea's military admitted the possibility of an illegal crossing border crossing to North Korea as high.
There were on some people.
According to North Korea its own statements, North Korea called an urmeeting by the Poliburo of the Labour Party chaired by ruler Kim Jong Un on Saturday because of the suspicion.
The "dangerous situation in Kaesong could trigger a deadly and destructive catastrophe."
Kim already ordered on Friday as a preventive measure to "completely block Kaesong and isolate each district and the region from others," it continued.
The affected person concerned and as all people in Kaesong who would had in contact with him were been quarantined.
The central military commission of the party is therefore investigate the "outbreak" as and the behaviour of the responsible military unit and, if necessary, impose sh punishment.
It estimated that about 300,000 people live in Kaesong.
Tenitement before Council meeting: CitEast and noise protection are under discussion before a big summer break
"In addition to environmental issues, the committee members will also vote on the development plan for the major InnadtDevelopung-Ost project," is rather casually in the central part of the city press release for the next municipal council meeting on Tuesday, 28 July, at 4.30 p.m. in the Great Hall of the Congress Center Pforzheim.
However, the appreciation of the eastern city is controversial until the end.
The majorities for this are scarce, most recently in individual committees depending on the presence.
An appeal from the economy (construction, real estate, trade and IT), to the project developed from the citizenry and then by administration and municipal council not fail after almost ten years of preparation, criticized project opponent Reinhard Klein as "extraparliamentary opposition", "unsuspecting", "speculation", "denration" and "conscious false statements".
"Everyone thinks they know better," says Klein, who has been member of the municipal council as the only representative of the Pforzheim citizens list for a year.
In fact, after reading the treaties, he is in this position: "I know what I am talking about."
The exit the city cheaper, the Technical City Hall is contrary to the city administration, after grants, whose existence of Klein is convinced to ate for 8.5 million euros.
The city will develop quite differently than one predict economy in the town hall and the supponents.
Designing the city by its own strength and not an investor B. One day after Klein, the FDP / FW / UB / LED Group, which also rejects the project, presented an alternative concept.
It also visthe renovation of the Technical Town Hall, the disclosure of the Schloßberg, the rental of the ex-Thale for administrative areas and a smaller scale inner center design in ideally with local carriers.
Environmental issues play a central role
In addition, environmental issues in particular will play a central role.
Among other things, the municipal council will vote on the noise action plan.
This includes various measures to protect the Pforzheim population from health noise pollution, caused by road traffic, including temporary reductions.
press local transport However, the political leaders in the city are not innocent of the fact that this must come in a because they have only contributed to the massive increase in of car traffic thus noise ne.
The municipal council also coordinates on the participation of the city of the energy and climate protection agency Pforzheim / Enzkreis.
In addition, the agenda is accession to the Climate Protection Pact of the State of Baden-Württemberg, the reestablishment of parental contributions in the urban day-care institutions and the application for admission in the smart city funding of the federal.
Citizens are welcome, but must heed Corona protection measures.
With a lot delay Tim Zimmermann starts the new season
With almost half a year delay, Tim Zimmermann will start his premiere season at the ADAC GT Masters on 31 July.
Before the League of Supersports cars can start regular operation, the first test drives were now due.
For Zimmerpmann, it was all about getting to know his Lamborghini Huracan GT3 better.
The Corona crisis has long prevprevTim Zimmermann from tstarting his first business trip in the new Lamborghini Huracan from Grasser Racing.
This was now possible under special hygiene conditions.
The 23-year-old Langenargener made his first laps on the Lausitzring and was able to get used to his premiere in the GT3 car.
"There are already a few things that are different from the Porsche from the previous ason," says Zimmermann.
"With the ABS, for example, you have to go differently into the curves.
But it really was a lot of fun. "
Zimmermann also had fun with Steijn Schothorst, with whom he will share his orange sports car in the GT Masters.
Despite his only 25 years, the Dutch has been experienced in GT sport and was able to help his new teammmate in many things.
"I'm not a beginner in motorsport, but every new series also brings new challenges," says Zimmermann.
"Steijn and I get along dazzling and we also made tremenormous progress from session to session at the Lausitzring". "
Exactly there - at the Lausitzring - the GT Masters will also host its first race.
From 31 July, the 33 supersports cars will race through Lusatia.
Zimmermann, who is one of 15 series newcomers, knows the track.
In 2015 he was last a guest at the Motodrom.
"It worked fast and I didn had to get used little to the track," says Zimmermann, who starts for the Friedrichshafen racing community Graf Zeppelin.
"The Lausitzring has many fast passages that you have to meet optimally to be fast".
How fast Zimmerpmann really is turns out in two weeks.
"Of course, the teams popoker a little in the tests," he says.
"Finally, however, we are very satisfied and look looking forward to the first weekend at Lausitzring".
The race in Brandenburg will be the prelustart of a tighsely crowded calendar.
Seven races will scheduled by the beginning of November.
Currently state is that no spectators will be admitted - but there is a prominent guest.
In mid-August at the Nürburgring, former Formula 1 driver Niko Hülkenberg will reach the GT steering wheel.
British Minister of Transport Minister by Quantine decision cold caught
According to the press reports, decision of the British government decision to quarantine Spanish holidaymakers quarantine for two weeks after their return has caught the country's Minister of Transport cold according.
ord, Grant Shapps is currently on holiday in Spain, while his colleagues at home decided the measure on Saturday.
Due of the rising Corona figures in Spain, the Cabcabinet in London removed the country from the list of those countries from which entry without quarantine conditions is possible.
The new regulation will applies from today, Sunday, so Shapps will also have to quarantine after his return.
In Austria, the government has also imposed quarantine measures on returnees.
But the regulation applies to those who are only holiday on the deadline, only from Saturday, 1 August, and was not introduced overnight.
By the dentally, Spain has far been considered one of the "safe countries" in Austria for which no quarantine is needed in Austria.
"Numerous ministers may have known in advance that there is a possibility of quarantine imposed for holidaymakers on Spain," commented Labour P Diane Abbot.
"But apparently no one has bothered to tell Grant Shapps."
Almost a month after the end of the Corona emergency in Spain and the iry of the strict curfew, the of infection in the country are again.
Virorologists blame nightlife for the new spread.
Spain is one of the favorite holiday countries of the British.
The British government is currently advises unnecessary travel to mainland Spain, and the Canary Islands and Balearic Islands, particularly popular British holidaymakers are excluded.
To date, more than 272,000 infections with the novel coronavirus and more than 28,000 aths have been registered in Spain.
Russia: Navy Day: Putin Announces hypersonic weapons for warships
On the Day Navy Day in country, Russian President Vladimir Putin announced a equipment of warships with the most modern hypersonic weapons.
With these weapons, unique in the world would expand the fighting capabilities of the Russian naval forces, Putin said on Sunday in St. Petersburg at the central naval parade.
According to the agency Interfax, the Ministry of Defense also informed about successful tests of the Zirhypersonic misle built for the Navy.
The hypersonic weapons have multiple the speed of sound of around 343 meters per second.
They are considered weapons of the future.
Underwater tropedeo will be built
It is also built on the atomically underwater torpedo Poseidon, it was said.
The planned sea drone is planned to destroy coastal targets.
The president, who himself also sailed by a military boat, said that this year alone 40 new ships would be put into service with the individual fleet associations of the largest country on the world.
Russia has such a large coastal area as no other country in the world.
For 300 years, the Navy has been reliably protecting Russia, Putin on the day celebrated by sailors nationwide.
Also on many other Russian coastal towns, the naval forces celebrated the Day of Navy with parades.
In Syria, where Russia ffighting alongside ruler Bashar al-Assad, the military demonstrated strength at a arms show in the Mediterranean port of Tartu.
ammunition was also fired.
A video published by the Ministry of Defense featured not only warships, including a submarine, but also combat helicopters and jets.
Hurricane "Hanna" reaches Texas: Help with Corona made difficult
Washington - This first hurricane of this year's season across the Atlantic has fallen ashore in Texas.
Threthreatening floods, strong winds and heavy rainfall now threatened parts of the US state, the National Hurricane Center of the US Climate (NOAA on the night of Sunday (local time).
Governor Greg Abbott declared a state of emergency for many districts.
The ampant Corona pandemic rampant in Texas made the work of the helpers difficult, Abbott continued according to the US media.
Evacuees called for caution
"Every hurricane is a huge challenge," Abbott said according to the newspaper Houston Chronicle.
With regard to the cyclone in Texas, he added: "This challenge is complicated and is exacerbated considering that he sweeps through an area that is the most affected area most affected by Covid-19."
According to Johns Hopkins University, around 5,000 people have died in Texas alone as a result of the Corona pandemic.
Abbott called caupeople who had to leave their homes.
They should not disregard practices we have accstomed to ", such as wearing masks, said the governor said according to caster CBS.
It is important that everyone kept distance.
Therefore, hotel rooms were provided in some places.
In addition, emergency shelters on Corona.
Damage was initially reported from the coastal city of Port Mansfield.
Storm warning withdrawn
With wind speeds of up to 150 kilometers per hour, "Hanna" was hit land on the island of Padre Island land just off the Texas an coast.
The tropical storm had previously been upgraded to the hurricane of the lowest level one hurri.
For the coast from Port Mansfield to Sargent, a storm ge warning was issued and later withdrawn.
Authorities expected a weakening, while "Hanna" move inland and heading towards northeastern Mexico.
"Douglas" moves to Hawaii
In the Pacific, Hurricane "Douglas" travelled towards Hawaii night on Sunday with wind speeds of about 150 kilometers per hour.
However, the hurricane center expected it to continue to weaken.
According to the prediction, it is be near on Sunday (local time) near the largest islands in Hawaii - then as a storm just below the hurricane threshold.
Above the Atlantic, NOAA expected an above-average hurricane season this year after a forecast May.
From June to the end of November, up to ten hurricanes were to expected, of which up to six could become be very strong cyclcanones, the authority had declared.
On average, there are six hurricanes per year across the Atlantic, three of which develop into storms of great strength.
In view of available climate data and the higher water temperature in the Atlantic and the Caribbean, the likelihood of a normal season was only 30 percent, which of a below ow-average even ten percent, it was said time.
US President Donald Trump wrote on Twitter that his government was closely closely the storms and is in contact with the affected states concerned.
Four goals restrioked: Video assistant "punished" Sassuolo
Sassuolos Filip Djuricic were stripped two goals
Naples - Four goals scored, stripped four goals: Sassuolo Calcio experienced a raven-black evening at 0: 2 (0: 1) at the SSC Naples in the Italian football league Serie A - and was really sgry on the video assistant of the referee.
"A festival of ungiven goals for Sassuolo.
The VAR never been so hard against a team, "commented the" Corriere dello Sport ".
Host Naples had taken lead through a goal by foreign ender Elseid Hisaj in the 8th minute, in the 32nd minute Filip Djuricic hacelebrated the compensation.
The Video Assistant Referee (VAR) drew the goal due to a side position.
Five minutes later, Djuricic shot the ball back on the net again - again the VAR intervened again.
The ee team also took the goals of atters Francesco Caputo (50th) and Domenico Berardi (61 1st).
In the extra season, Allan made the 2-0 score perfect for Naples and the bitter evening for Sassuolo.
"The VAR is worse for Sassuolo, than a radar trap on the road and punishes Sassuolo like no team before.
The new technology makes records, "writes the" Gazzetta dello Sport ".
FC Bayern Munich: Pavard injured
Munich (dpa) - The start of the hot preparation phase for the Champions League began with a setback for douchampion FC Bayern.
Hansi Flick, was "somewhat reasongood" after a short holiday and a few days training days has to think after the first team training, how he can build his successful defense after the injury of world champion Benjamin Pavard.
The Frenchman, who has the third most minutes of minutes behind Captain Manuel Neuer and midfielmanager Joshua Kimmich, suffered a band injury on the left root the foot and threatens to be missing in decisive quclass duels.
In Munich smuty weather, the right-defender dropped off a training game and was driven from the square with a golf kart.
How long the restricted regular player has to pause in the fight for the title is open.
A match in the eighof final second leg against Chelsea FC on 8 August should be difficult, the 24-year-old can hope for the final tournament starting in Lisbon on 12 August in Lisbon.
But Bavarians do not want to be stopped by the mishap from the training on Sunday.
In his personal triple formula, Flick called the three attributes he wants to see from his stars on the way to Portugal's capital.
Quality, intensity and concentration should show its vichungry title collectors in the ideally following 28 days until the king class final final on 23 August.
"We simply mastered the mandatory tasks with championship and trophy.
Now it's important to create the special, "said Flick.
Until the Munich can deal with the final tournament and previously a training camp in the Algarve, however the eighof final obligation against FC Chelsea is due.
After the 3 – 0 in the first leg before the Corona break, the Londoners in the home arena should not become Bavaria nightmare in 2012 as in the lost "final dahoam" in 2012.
"We have to go through the door.
We want to win, create good conditions and ain confidence with a good game, "demanded Flick demanded.
A test attunement will be scheduled on Friday against Olympique Marseille.
With a long speech, Flick had sworn his stars, who had a 13 days of holiday after the double, to a unique August.
He welcomed 31 players on Säbener Straße, including the new players for noble purchasing Leroy Sané, who met all new colleagues on in the pitch for the first time after his move from Manchester City.
"Leroy fit well like all new comones," Flick.
But instead of talking about the new season, when Sané & Co. are no longer only allowed to train, Flick preferred to talk about the current title project of the German series champion.
After days of individual and small group training, they is now trained in team strength for the Londoners, who are in contrast to the Fliensemble, are in play.
After that, the Munich could be face a quarter-finals against FC Barcelona and Lionel Messi, in the semifinals Real Madrid, Manchester City or Juventus Turin are possible opponents.
A way to the final in Lisbon "is not quite so easy," stressed the head coach, who can rely on the services of his new assistant Miroslav Klose in training from Tuesday.
The World Championship record scoter Klose and Flick know of many joint tournament preparation, which is particularly important in the 0-to 100 tun.
With his current team, working is "a pleasure", praised Flick praised.
The "focus on profits" is an impressive trait of his team.
At the tournament with nine-teams it was also ambitious on Sunday.
Everyone there the performers there, including the Thiago and defender David Alaba, whose whereabouts is not secured beyond the royal class season.
Formula 1 needs a special rule to select its world champion
Since it cannot to drive on the required number of continents, the FIA must improvise to award the World Cup titles.
All, America races were cancelled.
Racing calendar is becoming increasingly concrete
The race calendar of the current Formula 1 season continues to take shape.
In addition to the ten confirmed Grand Prix so date, three more race tracks were added during the week.
In October, Porão will to drive at the Nürburgring in Germany and Portimão, Portugal.
On first November, Lewis Hamilton and Co. fight for World Championship points on the traditional Italian track in Imola.
According to, the 2020 race calendar 2020 comprises 13 races.
"We are pleased to continue to make great progress in completing our plans for the 2020 season," said Formula 1 boss Chase Carey.
A total of 15 to 18 races will be in the premier class of motorsport in this extraordinary season.
Formula 1 wants to complete its season in Asia.
The final race calendar will to be fixed and published in the coming weeks.
Prior to the officially targeted races in Bahrain and Abu Dhabi in December, media reports could appearances in Vietnam and Malaysia could still take place at the end of November.
Regulations require races on three continents
However, the regulations of Formula 1 require at least races on three continents for the award of the World Championship.
Even if, as currently planned, is only driven on two continents, there should be a world champion.
With the help of a special rule, the FIA wants to award the titles citing on "extraordinary circumstances" due of the coronavirus panic.
The traditional start of the season in Australia in March had to be cancelled at the short notice due to the looming corona crisis.
A ning to the continent this year is not an issue.
In addition, Formula 1 will not be guest in America this year.
Cancal criticism in Brazil
Due to the tense corona situation, the races will not take place in Canada, the USA, Mexico and Brazil.
"We look forward to being back with them next season," Carey.
The rejcancellation of the American races was with ticicriticism especially in Brazil: "The rejuscancellation was not come surprising for us, but we cannot accept the reasons for this," said Tamas Rohonyi, promoter of the Grand Prix in São Paulo.
Thus, the number of infection in the São Paulo area are significantly lower than in other regions of Brazil.
The concerns of some teams about not want to drive in Brazil would also not justify any rejal.
One is prepared for the required security measures.
Greta Thunberg: Evil look against Donald Trump went around the world
Greta Thunberg talked about her meeting with US President Donald Trump.
Greta Thunberg was a guest Stephen Colbert well-known latenight show by Stephen Colbert via video and revealed in an interview what she had in her mind when her encounter with Donald Trump.
Climate artist Greta Thunberg was a guest on a popular US latenight show via video.
She, among other things, she about her fight against the powerful of the world.
The teenager also talked about her famous "evil galook" at her encounter with Donald Trump.
New York City - Over the past two years, climate activist Greta Thunberg has attracted attention with her tireless commitment to the "Fridays For Future" movement.
Now she talked in a well-known latenight show about her plans in the future well as her encounter with US President Donald Trump at the UN climate summit last year.
Latenight presenter Stephen Colbert welcomed 17-year-old Thunberg Tuesday in your show Tuesday and conducted a longer interview with the Swedish.
She spoke not only about her fight against climate change, but also about her conflict with the powerful of the world.
"There are some things that surprised me," she said.
"How far people go to stedirect the focus away from the climate crisis," she shaken.
"Everything from organized hate campaigns to threats just because a group of children take to the streets" she experienced.
Heads of state and leading politicians who mock against them in social media or even try to silence them find them "funny" as they show her the reactions, "since they have no other answer to".
It became particularly interesting at the end of the interview, when Greta Thunberg was addressed to a well-known scene in which she w US President Trump a bitteritter look.
At the 2019 UN climate Summit 2019 in New York, for which the nude visor sailed across the Atlantic, her expressive view was caught by the cameras and has since been seen by countless people on the Internet.
The short clip created a GIF, an animated image which ultimately became one of the most commonly used images for Trump opponents.
But what did the 17-year-old think about the US president at that moment?
To the relatively question of Stephen Colbert, she lied briefly and dry: "To be honest, I think this does not require further explanation.
The experienced satirist Colbert had not expected the quickwitanswer and disappeared from the picture laugh.
With her "How dare you?" speech on the principles of climate protection, she was remembered many at the climate conference.
Ex-Dortmund Immobile with triple pack for Lazio Rome
Ciro Immobile is now in the race for Europe's Golden Shoe with Bavaria's Robert Lewandowski.
The former Dortmund Ciro Immobile has the best chance of becoming top scorer in the Italian football Championship.
The former BVB professional contributed three goals in the 5 – 1 (1: 1) victory of Lazio Rome at Hellas Verona, including two transformed penalty in the extra seasons of both halves.
Thus the 30-year-old now has two games of the games before 34 season goals on his account - Robert Lewandowski from FC Bayern Munich achieved just as many in the past Bundesliga season.
In Italy, Cristiano Ronaldo follows with 30 goals far, the Portuguese superstar met Sampdoria Genoa with the in the evening.
Fleetwood Mac co-founder Peter Green died
His life was like a roller ercoaster ride: After a rapid asclimb with Fleetwood Mac, it went steeply downhill and then slowly up again.
Now bluesrock guitarist Peter Green died at the age of 73.
Ingenious guitarist, drug junkie, cult follower: The co-founder of the band Fleetwood Mac, Peter Green, is dead.
He died peacefully in sleep at the age of 73, told family members on Saturday in an official statement that another statement would be announced for the next few days.
Top musicians such as Peter Frampton praised Green as one of the best blues and rock guitarists.
Mick Fleetwood spoke in an emotional reaction of a "monumental loss" for all former and current members of the band Fleetwood Mac.
The drummer Fleetwood and guitarist Green had founded the long-legendary band in London in 1967, his dreamy instrumental hit "Albatross" is still unforforgotten to today.
The life of the musician ("The End Of The Game", "In The Skies") like a roller ercoaster ride.
With Fleetwood Mac, Green experienced a rapid rise - the band celebrated their greatest successes but then without him.
Among other things, there said have been disputes because Green wanted to donate all the group's profits for charity.
He began to appear in wide robes and with a large crucifix.
MMental problems are also said have played a role.
Three years after founding, Green left the band in 1970.
This was followed by a social descent.
The bluesrock guitarist suffered from drug abuse and schizophrenia, as biographers reported.
For a long time, Green was treated in psychiatry.
During much of the 1970s, the musician disappeared from the scene.
He is said to have lived temporarily on the street, worked as a cemetery gardener and spent for a time in an Israeli kibbutz.
Green was born in 1946, the son of a Jewish working-class family in Bethnal Green London.
At a young age, he was enthusiastic about US blumusicians such as B.B. King and Muddy Waters.
At the age of eleven he learned the first guitar efs.
At the age of 15, the teenager began playing professional guitar professionally and five years later got the chance to stand on stage as a lead guitarist for the instrumental band Peter B's Looners.
He he was hired by the Bluesbreakers as a replacement for his idol Eric Clapton.
In the midst of the blues boom, Green founded Fleetwood Mac in the summer of 1967 along with his Bluesbreakers colleagues Mick Fleetwood and John McVie.
The song "Albatross", composed by Green, gave the group the number 1 hit in the winter of 1968 / 69 and catapulted it to the top of the British music scene.
But the fast ascent soon showed its downsides: Green did not cope with the media hype, his experiments with the drug LSD became more and more extreme.
He later commented on the life between music and addiction in an interview: "The worst thing that happened to me in life is the drugs - the best to land a number 1 hit". "
Towards the end of the decade in 1979, Green surprisingly achieved an eighsuccess with an album inspired by religious themes 1979.
Meanwhile Fleetwood Mac swam on a wave of success a wave of success in a new formation.
Their 1977 album "Rumours", sold more than 40 million copies worldwide.
Despite various small solo successes, Green did not achieve a major comeback until he started in 1996 with a group of friendly musicians.
The British "Daily Telegraph" spoke of a rock star returned to Earth.
Free of drugs gs, Green released several albums with the Peter Green Splinter Group until the band disbanded in 2004.
For music experts he was already a blues legend during his lifetime - and with his gentle sound one of the most influential guitarists of recent decades.
